Louisiana, session 2026, HB789.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 14:99.2(A), (B)(2), and (B)(3)(introductory paragraph) are hereby
amended and reenacted and R.S. 14:99.3 and 99.4 are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§99.2. Reckless operation of an off-road vehicle
A. Reckless operation of an off-road vehicle is the operation of any off-road
vehicle in a criminally negligent or reckless manner upon any public roadway or
right of way which public roadway or right of way is located within the territorial
jurisdiction of a municipality or incorporated area of a parish.
B.
* * *
(2) For the purposes of this Section and R.S. 14:99.3, acts which may
constitute reckless operation of an off-road vehicle shall include but not be limited
to operating the vehicle on a public roadway or right of way in a manner that does
any of the following:
(a) Forces another vehicle to leave the roadway.
(b) Collides with another vehicle or person.
(c) Exceeds the posted speed limit.
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 789 ENROLLED
(d) Travels against the flow of traffic.
(e) Disregards traffic control devices.
(f) Drives around or between standing or moving vehicles without regard to
lanes of traffic.
(g) Impedes traffic flow.
(h) Travels Deliberately travels off the roadway and back on to onto the
roadway deliberately.
(3) For purposes of this Section, reckless operation of an off-road vehicle
shall also include operating the vehicle on a public roadway or right of way which
public roadway or right of way is located within the territorial jurisdiction of a
municipality or incorporated area of a parish:
* * *
§99.3. Seizure of an off-road vehicle
A. Any off-road vehicle that is not evidence of a criminal violation may be
seized for forfeiture by any law enforcement agency designated by the district
attorney, with or without process issued by any district court, on probable cause to
believe that the off-road vehicle was used in violation of R.S. 14:99.2. Within
seventy-two hours, exclusive of holidays or weekends, after actual or constructive
seizure, the seizing agency shall apply to the court for a warrant of seizure to hold
the property pending forfeiture, unless such warrant has been previously obtained.
Such application shall be on an affidavit under oath demonstrating that probable
cause exists for seizure of the property. The sufficiency of the warrant of seizure and
affidavit under oath shall be determined in accordance with the law on search
warrants. The court may order that the property be held pending forfeiture on such
terms and conditions as are reasonable in the discretion of the court. Upon a finding
of no probable cause, the property shall be released to the established owner.
B. A seizure for forfeiture without process is reasonable if made under
circumstances in which a warrantless seizure or arrest would be reasonable in
accordance with law.
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 789 ENROLLED
C. Any off-road vehicle that is alleged to be evidence of a criminal violation
may be seized for forfeiture by any law enforcement agency designated by the
district attorney, with or without process issued by any district court, on probable
cause to believe that the off-road vehicle was used in violation of R.S. 14:99.2.
Within seventy-two hours, exclusive of holidays or weekends, after service of notice
of pending forfeiture, the seizing agency shall apply to the court for a warrant of
seizure to hold the property pending forfeiture, unless such warrant has been
previously obtained. Such application shall be on an affidavit under oath
demonstrating that probable cause exists for seizure of the property, regardless of
whether the proceedings to forfeit property are brought pursuant to federal or state
action and regardless of whether the property has been the subject of a previous final
judgment of forfeiture in the courts of any state or the United States. The sufficiency
of seizure and affidavit under oath shall be determined in accordance with the law
on search warrants. The court may order that the property be held pending forfeiture
on such terms and conditions as are reasonable in the discretion of the court.
D. Any seizing agency designated by the district attorney to make seizures
for forfeiture shall notify the district attorney within ten days after such seizure.
E. The forfeiture of off-road vehicles may be prosecuted in conjunction with
the underlying violations of R.S. 14:99.2, or the prosecutor may file a separate in rem
action against the off-road vehicle. The district attorney may transfer this seizure
action to any other agency that may be prosecuting the associated criminal violations
of R.S. 14:99.2.
F. For the purposes of this Section and R.S. 14:99.4, when the office of the
attorney general acts as the ad hoc district attorney for the prosecution of the
underlying violation of R.S. 14:99.2, the office of the attorney general shall have all
of the powers and duties of the office of the district attorney. In all such cases, the
office of the attorney general may elect to prosecute the forfeiture in addition to the
underlying crime. Upon successful prosecution of the forfeiture by the office of the
attorney general, the share of the proceeds that would have otherwise gone to the
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 789 ENROLLED
office of the district attorney shall be paid to the office of the attorney general as the
agency that employs the attorneys handling the prosecution.
§99.4. Judicial disposition of off-road vehicles; disbursement of proceeds
A. If after thirty days of the Notice of Pending Forfeiture having been given
to the owner and all lienholders of record with the office of motor vehicles, and no
claims are timely filed in an action in rem, the district attorney may apply for an
order of forfeiture and allocation of forfeited property with the court of jurisdiction.
Upon a determination by the court that the prosecuting agency's written application
establishes the court's jurisdiction, the giving of proper notice, and facts sufficient
to show probable cause for forfeiture, the court shall order the property forfeited to
the state.
B. After final disposition of all claims timely filed in an action in rem, the
court shall enter an order that the state has clear title to the forfeited off-road vehicle.
Title to the forfeited off-road vehicle and its proceeds shall be deemed to have vested
in the state on the commission of the conduct giving rise to the forfeiture pursuant
to R.S. 14:99.3.
C. On order of the court forfeiting the off-road vehicle, the state may transfer
good and sufficient title to any subsequent purchaser or transferee, and the title shall
be recognized by all courts, by this state, and by all agencies of this state and any
political subdivision.
D. Upon motion by the prosecuting attorney, if it appears after a hearing that
there was reasonable cause for the seizure for forfeiture or for the filing of the Notice
of Pending Forfeiture or petition, the court shall cause a finding to be entered that
reasonable cause existed, and the claimant is not entitled to costs or damages, and
the person or seizing agency who made the seizure and the prosecuting agency are
not liable to suit or judgment on account of the seizure, suit, or prosecution.
E. The court shall order a claimant who fails to establish that a substantial
portion of the claimant's interest is exempt from forfeiture pursuant to R.S. 14:99.3
to pay the reasonable costs and expenses of the state for the investigation and
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 789 ENROLLED
prosecution of the matter, including reasonable attorney fees, in connection with that
claimant.
F. Off-road vehicles seized pursuant to the provisions of R.S. 14:99.3 shall
be destroyed or sold at public auction without appraisal, subject to the discretion of
the prosecuting attorney, and any proceeds resulting from the disposition of the
vehicles shall be disbursed in the order of priority as follows:
(1)(a) For satisfaction of any bona fide security interest or lien.
(b) Thereafter, for payment of all proper expenses of the proceedings for
forfeiture and sale, including expenses of seizure, maintenance of custody,
advertising, and court costs.
(2) The remaining funds shall be allocated as follows:
(a) Sixty percent to the law enforcement agency or agencies making the
seizure, such proceeds to be used in drug law enforcement, including but not limited
to reward programs established by the agencies.
(b) Twenty percent to the criminal court fund.
(c) Twenty percent to the office of the prosecuting agency that employs the
attorneys who execute the forfeiture action for the state.
Section 2. R.S. 14:99.2(E)(4) is hereby repealed in its entirety.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.